Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB292.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6506. Late removal of campaign signage on public property.(a) Offense defined.--A candidate, or person acting on behalf of a candidate, who posts campaign signage on public property in furtherance of a political campaign shall:(1) abide by all lawful local ordinances which are applicable to signage; and(2) remove the signage by the date lawfully required by applicable local ordinance, but not later than 10 days following an election.(b) Penalty.--A candidate who violates this section is guilty of a summary offense and, upon conviction, shall be 12345678910111213141516171819 sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $300 and shall be sentenced to not less than five hours nor more than 30 hours of community service to be completed in six months in which the defendant is required to pick up campaign signs as well as litter or illegally dumped trash.(c) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "candidate" means an individual who seeks nomination or election to public office by vote of the electorate.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0292PN0236 - 2 - 123456789